Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-105.04
Change of residence; duties.

A notary public shall notify the Secretary of State of any change of his or her residence no later than forty-five days after such change. Information provided on the change-of-address form shall include the notary public's name as it appears on his or her commission, the date the commission expires, and the notary public's new address. The Secretary of State shall prescribe forms consistent with the requirements of this section.

Laws 2004, LB 315, § 10.